North Carolina, session 2025, HB1227.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of S.L. 2007-66, as amended by S.L. 2008-58 and S.L.
2008-75, reads as rewritten:
"SECTION 2. This act applies to the Towns of Cary, Chapel Hill, Davidson, and Wake
Forest and to the City of Wilson."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*H1227-v-1*